Hawaii statutes.
§633-33 Judgment for wages; oral
examination; payment. When a judgment in an action pursuant to this
chapter is founded in whole or in part on a claim for wages or personal
services, the court shall, upon motion of the party obtaining judgment, order
the appearance of the party against whom the judgment has been entered but not
more often than once each week for four consecutive weeks, for oral examination
under oath as to his financial status and his ability to pay the judgment, and
the court shall make such supplementary orders as seems just and proper to
effectuate the payment of the judgment upon reasonable terms. [L 1970, c 182,
pt of §1; am L 1971, c 144, §26]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next